Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 7
ENACTMENT OF LAWS REGARDING
SENTENCING OF CRIMINAL OFFENDERS

2-2-701. General assembly - bills regarding the sentencing of criminal offenders - legislative intent - definition.

Repealed.

On and after July 1, 1994, any bill which is introduced at any session of the general assembly which affects criminal sentencing and which may result in a net increase or a net decrease in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities shall be reviewed by the director of research of the legislative council for the purpose of providing information to the general assembly on the long-term fiscal impact which may result from the passage of the bill, including the increased capital construction costs, increased operating costs, and increased parole costs for the department of corrections for the first five fiscal years following the effective date of the bill. The division of criminal justice in the department of public safety in cooperation with the department of corrections shall annually provide incarceration and parole length of stay estimates to the director of research of the legislative council.

For purposes of this part 7, "state correctional facilities" means any facility under the supervision of the department of corrections in which persons are or may be lawfully held in custody as a result of conviction of a crime and any prison facility operated by a county, city and county, or private corporation located in this state or another state; except that it does not include any local jail, multijurisdictional jail, or community corrections center.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 390, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(3) added, p. 1097, § 7, effective May 9; (1) and (2) repealed, p. 1714, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) amended and (4) added, (SB 16-095), ch. 43, p. 104, § 1, effective August 10.

2-2-702. General assembly - bills regarding the sentencing of criminal offenders - required to be assigned to the appropriations committee of the house of introduction.

On and after July 1, 1991, any bill which is introduced into either house of the general assembly which affects the sentencing of criminal offenders and which would result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities shall, as soon as such net increase is determined, in addition to the assignment or referral of such bill to any other legislative committee or committees, be assigned or referred to the appropriations committees of the house into which such bill is introduced.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 391, § 1, effective July 1.

2-2-703. General assembly - bills which result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities - funding must be provided in the bill.

On and after July 1, 2025, a bill may not be passed by the general assembly which would result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment in state correctional facilities unless, in such bill, there is an appropriation of money which is sufficient to cover any increased capital construction costs, any increased operating costs, and increased parole costs which are the result of such bill for the department of corrections in each of the first five years following the effective date of the bill. Money sufficient to cover such increased capital construction costs and increased operating costs for the first five fiscal years following the effective date of the bill must be estimated by the appropriations committee, and after consideration of such estimate the general assembly shall make a determination as to the amount of money sufficient to cover the costs, and such money must be appropriated in the bill in the form of a statutory appropriation from the general fund in the years affected. Any such bill which is passed on or after July 1, 1991, which is silent as to whether it is intended to be an exception to this section, shall not be deemed to be such an exception. Any bill which is enacted which is intended to be an exception to this section must expressly state such exception in such bill.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire part added, p. 391, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-095), ch. 43, p. 105, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1330), ch. 104, p. 485, § 1, effective April 15.